Maryland, session 2026, HB1205.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
Subtitle 3. Salaries AND WAGES.
6–306.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “EDUCATION SUPPORT PROFESSIONAL” MEANS A
NONCERTIFICATED PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEE DESIGNATED AS PART OF A
NONSUPERVISORY BARGAINING UNIT UNDER SUBTITLE 5 OF THIS TITLE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1205*

HOUSE BILL 1205
(3) “PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
6–501 OF THIS TITLE.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING § 3–413 OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT
ARTICLE, BEGINNING JULY 1, 2028, EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL PAY TO EACH
EDUCATION SUPPORT PROFESSIONAL A MINIMUM WAGE RATE OF AT LEAST $25.00
PER HOUR.
(C) THE STATE BOARD MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO CARRY
OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2026, the State Department of Education shall submit to the Governor and, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly a report with an
estimate of the total cost of implementing a $25.00 per hour minimum wage for education
support professionals, with cost estimates disaggregated by local school system.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.